Missouri, session 2026, SB1714.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 393.130, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 393.130,
to read as follows:
393.130. 1. Every gas corporation, every electrical
corporation, every water corporation, and every sewer
corporation shall furnish and provide such service
instrumentalities and facilities as shall be safe and
adequate and in all respects just and reasonable. All
charges made or demanded by any such gas corporation,
electrical corporation, water corporation or sewer
corporation for gas, electricity, water, sewer or any
service rendered or to be rendered shall be just and
reasonable and not more than allowed by law or by order or
decision of the commission. Every unjust or unreasonable
charge made or demanded for gas, electricity, water, sewer
or any such service, or in connection therewith, or in
excess of that allowed by law or by order or decision of the
commission is prohibited. Such unjust or unreasonable
charges shall include charges or fees for:

SB 1714 2
(1) Any promotional advertising expenses by a gas
corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation, or
sewer corporation;
(2) Any charitable expenses by a gas corporation,
electrical corporation, water corporation, or sewer
corporation; and
(3) Any expenses by a gas corporation, electrical
corporation, water corporation, or sewer corporation for
lobbying purposes, including, but not limited to, any fees
or dues paid by a gas corporation, electrical corporation,
water corporation, or sewer corporation to trade
organizations that perform lobbying services at the federal,
state, or local level.
2. No gas corporation, electrical corporation, water
corporation or sewer corporation shall directly or
indirectly by any special rate, rebate, drawback or other
device or method, charge, demand, collect or receive from
any person or corporation a greater or less compensation for
gas, electricity, water, sewer or for any service rendered
or to be rendered or in connection therewith, except as
authorized in this chapter, than it charges, demands,
collects or receives from any other person or corporation
for doing a like and contemporaneous service with respect
thereto under the same or substantially similar
circumstances or conditions.
3. No gas corporation, electrical corporation, water
corporation or sewer corporation shall make or grant any
undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to any person,
corporation or locality, or to any particular description of
service in any respect whatsoever, or subject any particular
person, corporation or locality or any particular

SB 1714 3
description of service to any undue or unreasonable
prejudice or disadvantage in any respect whatsoever.
4. Nothing in this section shall be taken to prohibit
a gas corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation
or sewer corporation from establishing a sliding scale for a
fixed period for the automatic adjustment of charges for
gas, electricity, water, sewer or any service rendered or to
be rendered and the dividends to be paid stockholders of
such gas corporation, electrical corporation, water
corporation or sewer corporation; provided, that the sliding
scale shall first have been filed with and approved by the
commission; but nothing in this subsection shall operate to
prevent the commission after the expiration of such fixed
period from fixing proper, just and reasonable rates and
charges to be made for service as authorized in sections
393.110 to 393.285.
5. No water corporation shall be permitted to charge
any municipality or fire protection district a rate for the
placing and providing of fire hydrants for distribution of
water for use in protecting life and property from the
hazards of fire within such municipality or fire protection
district. Nothing herein shall prevent such water
corporation from including the cost of placement and
maintenance of such fire hydrants in its cost basis in
determining a fair and reasonable rate to be charged for
water. Any such fee or rental charge being made for such
fire hydrants whether by contract or otherwise at the time
this act shall take effect may remain in effect for a period
of one hundred twenty days after this section shall take
effect.
6. In any home rule city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county,

SB 1714 4
any deposits held by the city for any water or sewerage
services provided to a customer at any premises shall accrue
interest if the customer is current in payments for water
and sewerage services and if the city has held the deposit
for two or more years. Interest for each year, or part
thereof, shall accrue at the rate set for six month United
States treasury bills effective December thirty-first of the
preceding year. For any deposit held by the city on or
before the December thirty-first prior to August 28, 2002,
if that deposit is still held by the city on the December
thirty-first one year next following August 28, 2002,
interest accruing pursuant to this section from the
effective date shall be credited to the customer's
individual account, or paid to the customer, at the city's
discretion.
7. Each electrical corporation providing electric
service to more than two hundred fifty thousand customers
shall develop and submit to the commission schedules to
include in the electrical corporation's service tariff
applicable to customers who are reasonably projected to have
100 above an annual peak demand of one hundred megawatts or
101 more. The schedules should reasonably ensure such
102 customers' rates will reflect the customers' representative
103 share of the costs incurred to serve the customers and
104 prevent other customer classes' rates from reflecting any
105 unjust or unreasonable costs arising from service to such
106 customers. Each electrical corporation providing electric
107 service to two hundred fifty thousand or fewer customers as
108 of January 1, 2025, shall develop and submit to the
109 commission such schedules applicable to customers who are
110 reasonably projected to have above an annual peak demand of
111 fifty megawatts or more. The commission may order

SB 1714 5
112 electrical corporations to submit similar tariffs to
113 reasonably ensure that the rates of customers who are
114 reasonably projected to have annual peak demands below the
115 above-referenced levels will reflect the customers'
116 representative share of the costs incurred to serve the
117 customers and prevent other customer classes' rates from
118 reflecting any unjust or unreasonable costs arising from
119 service to such customers.
✓